District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.23

Electronic auctions.

(a)

The CPO may procure commercial products or commercial services through Reverse Auctions.

(b)

The CPO may place any requirement for a commercial product or commercial service on an established online Reverse Auction exchange that would allow any bidder to competitively bid down the price of that commercial product or commercial service over a stated period of time established by the CPO.

(c)

The CPO may establish an online auction exchange for the purposes of executing Reverse Auction transactions on behalf of the District.

(d)

The CPO may establish an online standard auction exchange for the purpose of executing standard auction transactions on behalf of the District government.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1203
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(f), 56 DCR 6603

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-312.03.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-312.03.